Hawaii statutes.
§436B-23 Summary suspension.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the licensing authority or its
delegate may cause the immediate suspension or restriction of a license,
subject to subsequent notice and hearing or other adequate procedures, upon a specific
determination that the failure to take such an action may result in: (1) an
immediate and unreasonable threat to personal safety; or (2) fraud or
misrepresentation upon consumers, and that, for the protection of the public
from the possible consequences of practices, the licensee's license should be
immediately suspended or restricted.

The licensing authority or its delegate may
order the summary suspension of the license for a period not to exceed twenty
days. The order of suspension shall be served upon the licensee at the same
time as the notice of hearing for disciplinary action, and the hearing shall be
scheduled prior to the expiration of the order of suspension. The period of
suspension prior to the hearing shall not be extended beyond twenty days except
upon request of the licensee for a reasonable continuance to adequately prepare
the licensee's defense. Any attempt by the licensee to continue the licensed
activity while the license has been summarily suspended shall of itself be
sufficient to warrant a permanent revocation of the license and shall subject
the licensee to all penalties prescribed by this chapter, the applicable
licensing laws, or any rule or order of the licensing authority. [L 1991, c
111, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 202, §19]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next